Utah statutes.
19-6-416.   Restrictions on delivery of petroleum -- Civil penalty.

(1)  After July 1, 1991, a person may not deliver petroleum to, place petroleum in, or accept petroleum for placement in a petroleum storage tank that is not identified in compliance with Subsection 19-6-411(7).

(2)  Any person who delivers or accepts delivery of petroleum to a petroleum storage tank or places petroleum, including waste petroleum substances, in an underground storage tank in violation of Subsection (1) is subject to a civil penalty of not more than $500 for each occurrence.

(3)  The director shall issue a notice of agency action assessing a civil penalty of not more than $500 against any person who delivers or accepts delivery of petroleum to a petroleum storage tank or places petroleum, including waste petroleum substances, in violation of Subsection (1) in a petroleum storage tank or underground storage tank.

(4)  A civil penalty may not be assessed under this section against any person who in good faith delivers or places petroleum in a petroleum storage tank or underground storage tank that is identified in compliance with Subsection 19-6-411(7) and rules made under that subsection, whether or not the tank is in actual compliance with the other requirements of Section 19-6-411.



Amended by Chapter 360, 2012 General Session

